src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Ingrian noun inflection
This file documents [affixes/nouns.lexc](../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)

This file documents the suffixes for noun inflection.

**LEXICON N_YÖ-SG** 

**LEXICON N_YÖ-SG_01** 

**LEXICON N_MAA** 

**LEXICON N_MAA_01** 

**LEXICON N_PREESENS**  preesens:preesens

**LEXICON N_PREESENS_01** 

**LEXICON N_GLASNOI** 

**LEXICON N_RISTI** 

**LEXICON N-risti_01** 

**LEXICON N_MATO**  mato (II)

**LEXICON N-mato_01** 

**LEXICON N_KOIVU**  koivu

**LEXICON N_OSA**  forma osa (II-b)

**LEXICON N-osa_01** 

**LEXICON N_JOKI**  joki:jok joki (II-c)

**LEXICON N-joki_01** 

**LEXICON N_LUMI**  lumi (II-d)

**LEXICON N-lumi_01** 

**LEXICON N_EMOI**  emoi (III)

**LEXICON N-emoi_01** 

**LEXICON N_JALKA**  the stem-final "a" is added here. jalka (IV)

**LEXICON N-jalka_01** 

**LEXICON N_KANA** 

**LEXICON N-kana_01** 

## Three-syllable words

**LEXICON N_MONIKKO** 

**LEXICON N_TYTÄR**  tytär:tyttä

**LEXICON N-tytär_01** 

**LEXICON N_PATSAS**  patsas:patsa

**LEXICON N-patsas_01** 

**LEXICON N_LÄHE**  lähe:lähte

**LEXICON N-lähe_01** 

**LEXICON N_SLOVARI**  from mato (II-e)

**LEXICON N-slovari_01** 

**LEXICON N_NUMERO**  numero:numero

**LEXICON N-numero_01** 

**LEXICON N_VOKALA**  the stem-final "a" is added here  vokala (IV-b)

**LEXICON N-vokala_01** 

**LEXICON N_HARAKKA**  harakka:harakk
This should operate using principles of ommeena

**LEXICON N-harakka_01** 

**LEXICON N_OMMEENA**  ommeena:omena

**LEXICON N_PUTTEELI**  putteeli:puteli

**LEXICON N-putteeli_01** 

**LEXICON N_LEIKKUU**  leikkuu, kiukkaa, lämmää (VI)

**LEXICON N-leikkuu_01** 

**LEXICON N_ASSIA**  assia:assi (VII)

**LEXICON N-assia_01** 

**LEXICON N-assia_01-Sg** 

**LEXICON N_PESÄ**  VCV

**LEXICON N-pesä_01** 

**LEXICON N_TÄHKÄ**  VCCV,  tähkä (VIII)

**LEXICON N-tähkä_01** 

**LEXICON N_TAEHTI**  tähti (IX)

**LEXICON NMN_TAEHTI_01** 

**LEXICON N_VARSI** 

**LEXICON N_VOOSI**  voosi:voo

**LEXICON N_MEES**  mees:mee (??)

**LEXICON N-mees_01** 

**LEXICON N_VARIS**  varis (XII)

**LEXICON N_KEELI**  keeli (IX-b)

**LEXICON N-keeli_01** 

**LEXICON N_SAMMAL** 

**LEXICON N-sammal_01** 

**LEXICON N_VENÄT**  kevät (XX-a)

**LEXICON N-venät_01** 

**LEXICON N-venät_01-Sg** 

**LEXICON N_PÄIVYT**  päivyt:päivy

**LEXICON N-päivyt_01** 

## DERIVATION 
One derivational process only, DER-t0in.

**LEXICON DER-tOin** 

## DECLENSION 

**LEXICON Cases** 

**LEXICON lOi-Pl** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Plural_blank** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Plural_sse** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Plural_V** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Plural_hV** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Plural** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Plural_less-EssExe** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Singular** 

**LEXICON Oblique-Singular_less-EssExe** 

## PLURAL TAGS 
Plural tags separated from singular ones.

**LEXICON PL-ABE** 

**LEXICON PL-ABL** 

**LEXICON PL-ABL_Px** 

**LEXICON PL-ADE** 

**LEXICON PL-ALL** 

**LEXICON PL-COM** +Dial/Lauk

**LEXICON PL-ELA** 

**LEXICON PL-ESS_Vn** +Dial/Soik

**LEXICON PL-ESS_n** 

**LEXICON PL-ESS_nnA** +Dial/Lauk

**LEXICON PL-EXE** 

**LEXICON PL-GEN** 

**LEXICON PL-ILL_blank** 

**LEXICON PL-ILL_sse** 

**LEXICON PL-ILL_V** 

**LEXICON PL-ILL_hV** 

**LEXICON PL-INE** 

**LEXICON PL-NOM** 

**LEXICON PL-PAR_A** 

**LEXICON PL-PAR_A-LCns** 

**LEXICON PL-PAR_tA** 

**LEXICON PL-PRL** 

**LEXICON PL-TRA** @

**LEXICON SG-ABE** 

**LEXICON SG-ABL** 

**LEXICON SG-ADE** 

**LEXICON SG-ALL** 

**LEXICON SG-COM** 

**LEXICON SG-ELA** 

**LEXICON SG-ESS_Vn** 

**LEXICON SG-ESS_nnA** 

**LEXICON SG-EXE** 

**LEXICON SG-GEN** 

**LEXICON SG-ILL_sse** 

**LEXICON SG-ILL_V** 

**LEXICON SG-ILL_hV** 

**LEXICON SG-INE** 

**LEXICON SG-NOM** 

**LEXICON SG-PAR_A** 

**LEXICON SG-PAR_tA** 

**LEXICON SG-TRA** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-izh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
